Maine, session 132, LD1408.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA c. 375, sub-c. 8 is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 8
JUDICIAL DEFERENCE TO AGENCY INTERPRETATION
§11011. Judicial deference
When construing a statute that an agency administers, or rules that an agency has
adopted, a court must use the 2-part analysis in this section.
1. Unambiguous. If the statute or rule is unambiguous as viewed in the context of the
statute's or rule's subject matter and purpose, the court must give effect to its plain meaning.
The language of the statute or rule is considered unambiguous if it is not reasonably
susceptible to different interpretations.
2. Ambiguous. If the plain language of a statute or rule is ambiguous, the court shall
defer to the interpretation of the statute or rule by the agency charged with its
implementation if:
A. The interpretation of the statute or rule involves issues that are within the scope of
the agency's expertise; and
B. The agency's interpretation is reasonable.
The provisions of this subchapter do not exclude or limit any other appropriate exercise
of judicial deference to agency judgment or expertise.